Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1591SV (3) 91 ss/ko S.F. 399 Section 1. Section 124E.8, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The department shall issue a request for proposals accept 3 applications to select and license by April 1, 2018, up to 4 five ten medical cannabidiol dispensaries to dispense medical 5 cannabidiol within this state consistent with the provisions 6 of this chapter . The department shall license new medical 7 cannabidiol dispensaries or relicense the existing medical 8 cannabidiol dispensaries by December 1 of each year. 9 Sec. 2. Section 124E.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 10 by striking the subsection. 11